Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.170

Expenditures by special purpose districts to recruit job candidates—Reimbursement for travel expenses.

Special purpose districts may expend funds to recruit job candidates and reimburse candidates for reasonable and necessary travel expenses, including transportation, subsistence, and lodging.

[ 1981 c 190 s 1.]